Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4670.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.055, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Hunting from vehicle by disabled hunters. (a) The commissioner may issue a special permit, without a fee, to discharge a firearm or bow and arrow from a stationary motor vehicle to a person who obtains the required licenses and who has a permanent physical disability that is more substantial than discomfort from walking. The permit recipient must be: (1) unable to step from a vehicle without aid of a wheelchair, crutches, braces, or other mechanical support or prosthetic device; or (2) unable to walk any distance because of a permanent lung, heart, or other internal disease that requires the person to use supplemental oxygen to assist breathing. (b) The permanent physical disability must be established by medical evidence verified in writing by a licensed physician, chiropractor, advanced practice registered nurse, or licensed physician assistant. The commissioner may request additional information from the physician, chiropractor, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician assistant if needed to verify the applicant's eligibility for the permit. Notwithstanding section 97A.418, the commissioner may, in consultation with appropriate advocacy groups, establish reasonable minimum standards for permits to be issued under this section. In addition to providing the medical evidence of a permanent disability, the applicant must possess a valid disability parking certificate authorized by section 169.345 or license plates issued under section 168.021. (c) A person issued a special permit under this subdivision and hunting deer may take a deer of either sex, except in those antlerless permit areas and seasons where no antlerless permits are offered. This subdivision does not authorize another member of a party to take an antlerless deer under section 97B.301, subdivision 3. (d) A permit issued under this subdivision is valid for five years. (e) The commissioner may deny, modify, suspend, or revoke a permit issued under this section for cause, including a violation of the game and fish laws or rules. (f) A person who knowingly makes a false application or assists another in making a false application for a permit under this section is guilty of a misdemeanor. A licensed physician, licensed advanced practice registered nurse, licensed physician assistant, or licensed chiropractor who fraudulently certifies to the commissioner that a person is permanently disabled as described in this section is guilty of a misdemeanor. (g) Notwithstanding paragraph (d), the commissioner may issue a permit valid for the entire life of the applicant if the commissioner determines that there is no chance that an applicant will become ineligible for a permit under this section and the applicant requests a lifetime permit.new text begin The commissioner must notify the commissioner of public safety if a lifetime permit is suspended or revoked under paragraph (e) for purposes of issuing drivers' licenses or Minnesota identification cards with indications under section 171.07, subdivision 21.new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective June 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.07, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 21. new text end new text begin Lifetime permit to discharge a firearm or bow and arrow from a stationary motor vehicle. new text end new text begin (a) The department must maintain in its records information transmitted electronically from the commissioner of natural resources identifying each person who has been issued a lifetime permit to discharge a firearm or bow and arrow from a stationary motor vehicle under section 97B.055, subdivision 3, paragraph (g). The records transmitted from the commissioner of natural resources must contain the full name and date of birth as required for the driver's license or Minnesota identification card. Records that are not matched to a driver's license or Minnesota identification card record may be deleted after seven years. new text end new text begin (b) After receiving information under paragraph (a) that a person has received a lifetime permit to discharge a firearm or bow and arrow from a stationary motor vehicle, the department must include, on all drivers' licenses or Minnesota identification cards subsequently issued to the person, a graphic or written indication that the person has received the permit unless the department has been notified that the permit has been suspended or revoked under section 97B.055, subdivision 3, paragraph (e). new text end new text begin (c) If a person who has received a lifetime permit applies for a driver's license or Minnesota identification card before that information has been transmitted to the department, the department may accept a copy of the permit as proof of its issuance and must then follow the procedures in paragraph (b). new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective June 1, 2027. new text end